Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.070

Oath of examiners—Liability for acts performed in good faith.

Before entering office each examiner shall take and subscribe an oath faithfully to discharge the duties of the office.

Oaths shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Neither the director of financial institutions, any deputized assistant of the director, nor any examiner or employee shall be personally liable for any act done in good faith in the performance of his or her duties.

[ 1993 c 472 s 21; 1977 ex.s. c 270 s 8; 1975 c 40 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.030. Prior: 1943 c 217 s 1; 1919 c 209 s 3; 1917 c 80 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 3210. Formerly RCW 43.19.030.]

NOTES:

Powers and duties of director of enterprise services as to official bonds: RCW 43.19.784.